Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1419
Records; required.

Every person operating under sections 66-1416 to 66-1419 shall make and keep for a period of three years, or five years if required reports, returns, or statements are not filed, such records as may reasonably be required by the department for the administration of such sections.

If, in the normal conduct of the business, the required records are maintained and kept at an office outside the State of Nebraska, it shall be a sufficient compliance with this section if the records are made available for audit and examination by the department within this state, but such audit and examination shall be without expense to the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 64.